Arkansas, session 2025, SB286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-9-521(g), concerning an employee
suffering a scheduled injury under the Workers' Compensation Law, is amended
to read as follows:
(g) Any employee suffering a scheduled injury shall not be entitled to
permanent partial disability benefits in excess of the percentage of
permanent physical impairment set forth above except as otherwise provided in
§ 11-9-519(b) In considering a claim for permanent partial disability
benefits in excess of the employee's percentage of permanent physical
impairment, the Workers' Compensation Commission may take into account, in
addition to the percentage of permanent physical impairment, such factors as
the employee's age, education, work experience, and other matters reasonably
expected to affect his or her future earning capacity.
*ANS194*
02/24/2025 4:04:47 PM ANS194